Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1403.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8128 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8128. Receiving facilities.(a) Purpose.--[A] As provided under this section, a receiving facility is a facility to which an ambulance may transport a patient who requires [prompt] medical [care] assessment and treatment in addition to that provided by the ambulance crew after the crew responds to an emergency.[(b) Requirements.--A receiving facility shall include, but need not be limited to, a fixed location having an organized emergency department, including a physician trained to manage cardiac, trauma, pediatric, medical, behavioral and all-hazards 123456789101112131415161718 emergencies, who is present in the facility and available to the emergency department 24 hours per day and seven days per week. By regulation, the department may authorize other types of facilities to serve as receiving facilities for purposes of serving patients who have special medical needs.](b.1) Regulations and protocol.--The department by regulation or protocol under section 8105(c) (relating to duties of department) or 8109(c)(8) (relating to regional emergency medical services councils) shall:(1) Authorize the types of facilities to serve as receiving facilities, including facilities to transport a patient during a suspected behavioral health crisis or substance use disorder issue.(2) Provide a procedure for emergency medical responders to contact a local co-responder program, mobile crisis team or medical mobile crisis team for assistance in crisis deescalation, assessment and referral prior to transport during a suspected behavioral health or substance use disorder patient contact.(c) Patient transports.--Unless directed otherwise by a medical command physician, the initial transport of a patient following an ambulance response to a reported emergency shall be to a receiving facility pursuant to a protocol under section 8105(c) [(relating to duties of department)] or 8109(c)(8) [(relating to regional emergency medical services councils)] or such other location as the department designated by protocol.Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8143. Transportation coverage.(a) Ambulance transportation.--Medical assistance program coverage for ambulance transportation shall be limited to 20260SB1403PN1863 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medically necessary treatment and, if necessary, transportation of eligible recipients to the recipient's home, nearest facility, nonhospital drug and alcohol detoxification or rehabilitation facility or receiving facility under section 8128 (relating to receiving facilities).(b) Emergency services.--If an EMS agency provides patient treatment in response to an actual or reported emergency and, if necessary, transports the patient to a receiving facility under section 8128, an insurer, medical assistance managed care plan or Children's Health Insurance Program managed care plan shall pay the emergency services payment amount for the services provided. Payment under this subsection shall be subject to applicable copayments, coinsurances or deductibles.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency services payment amount." The amount payable under the medical assistance ambulance fee schedule for patient treatment and, if necessary, patient transport provided by an emergency medical services agency in response to an actual or reported emergency."Medical assistance ambulance fee schedule." The ambulance fees established and updated by the Department of Human Services for the medical assistance program, including the ambulance fees updated under Medical Assistance Bulletin 26-24-01, effective January 1, 2024, and any subsequent update to the ambulance fees made in accordance with State law.Section 3. The provisions of 55 Pa. Code § 1245.11 (relating to types of services covered) are abrogated.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260SB1403PN1863 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930